District of Columbia statutes.
10-1121.05

Removal or relocation of public or private facilities.

The District shall not pay the cost of any removal or relocation of publicly or privately owned facilities in a street or alley in connection with the construction of a structure in airspace leased under this subchapter. No such facilities may be removed or relocated unless the Mayor has approved all arrangements for such removal or relocation.

Oct. 17, 1968, 82 Stat. 1167, Pub. L. 90-598, § 6
1981 Ed., § 7-1035.
1973 Ed., § 7-945.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.